Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
30-11-107.7. County rental tax on the rental of personal property - procedures - apportionment.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Personal property" means personal property which:

Is not subject to ad valorem tax pursuant to section 39-3-119, C.R.S., or specific ownership tax pursuant to section 42-3-107, C.R.S.; and

The owner thereof is regularly engaged in the sale, rental, or both sale and rental of such personal property and rents such personal property to another individual or corporation, in which the owner does not have any interest whatsoever, for one or more periods of thirty days or less in any calendar year.

"Personal property" does not include any residential real property as defined for property tax purposes in section 39-1-102 (14.5), C.R.S.

In accordance with the procedures set forth in this section, the board of county commissioners of each county may levy a rental tax on personal property which is rented in such county. The rate of any rental tax levied pursuant to this section shall be not more than one percent of the amount of the rental payment paid or charged to persons who rent such personal property.

The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, approve a rental tax on personal property which is rented in the county. Such resolution shall contain a description of the rental tax on personal property which is rented, state the rate of rental tax to be levied, and specify the effective date of the resolution.

Any rental tax levied pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be collected, administered, and enforced, to the extent feasible, pursuant to section 29-2-106, C.R.S.

The department of revenue shall perform, on an annual basis, an analysis to determine the net incremental cost of such collection, administration, and enforcement. The department of revenue shall retain only the amount determined to be necessary by the cost analysis, and in no event shall that amount exceed three and one-third percent of the amount collected. Such amount retained shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund, and such amount shall be subject to appropriations by the general assembly for the net incremental cost of such collection, administration, and enforcement.

During the month of January of each year, the county treasurer of any county which levies a rental tax pursuant to this section shall calculate, for such county and each political subdivision located within the boundaries of such county, the percentage which the dollar amount of ad valorem taxes levied by each such political entity is of the aggregate dollar amount of ad valorem taxes levied in such county during the preceding calendar year. The percentages so calculated shall be used for the apportionment between the county itself and each political subdivision located within such county of the aggregate amount of rental tax revenue to be distributed by the department of revenue to the county treasurer during the current calendar year.

All rental taxes collected by the county treasurer shall be apportioned, credited, and distributed to the county and to each political subdivision located within such county on the tenth day of each month for all rental taxes collected during the immediately preceding month.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1981, § 2, effective April 20.

L. 94:

(2)(c)(II) amended, p. 317, § 2, effective March 29; (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 2564, § 76, effective January 1, 1995.

30-11-107.9. County tax for public safety improvements - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Public safety improvements" means capital expenditures or operational costs associated with a public safety organization.

"Public safety organization" means a law enforcement agency or office, district attorney's office, judicial district, coroner's office, a fire protection district, fire department, or any other public entity dedicated to providing services related to public safety, public health, or emergency management at the county or local level in the state.

In accordance with the procedures set forth in this section, the board of county commissioners of each county may levy a sales tax for public safety improvements of not more than two percent on the sale of tangible personal property of retail and services taxable in such county pursuant to the provisions of section 39-26-104, C.R.S. All net revenues collected by a county after the payment of the costs of collection, administration, and enforcement to the department of revenue in accordance with subsection (4) of this section shall be used exclusively for public safety improvements.

The board of county commissioners of a county may by resolution approve a proposal for a county public safety improvements tax; thereupon the public safety improvements tax proposal must be submitted to the registered electors of the county at the next general election, the next biennial county election, or the next election held on the first Tuesday of November in an odd-numbered year as determined by the board of county commissioners. The proposal shall contain a description of the tax including its purposes and shall state the amount to be imposed. The proposal may include a provision to also seek voter approval to retain and expend all or a portion of the revenues of the tax from district fiscal year spending for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution. The conduct of the election shall conform so far as practicable to the general election laws of the state and with the provisions of said section 20.

The county public safety improvements tax shall be collected, administered, and enforced, to the extent feasible, pursuant to section 29-2-106, C.R.S.

The department of revenue shall perform, on an annual basis, an analysis to determine the net incremental cost of such collection, administration, and enforcement. The department shall retain only the amount determined to be necessary by the cost analysis, and in no event shall that amount exceed three and one-third percent of the amount collected. Such amount retained shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund, and such amount shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the net incremental cost of such collection, administration, and enforcement.

No public moneys from any source shall be expended directly or indirectly to urge electors to vote in favor or against the imposition of a county public safety improvements tax. Nothing in this subsection (5) shall be construed as prohibiting an elected official from expressing his or her personal opinion concerning the imposition of the tax.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1459, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1342), ch. 235, p. 965, § 1, effective May 24.

30-11-108. Assent of electors required - when.

The board of county commissioners shall not borrow money for the purposes stated in section 30-11-107, except as provided in section 30-11-107 (1)(dd), without having first submitted the question of such loan to a vote of the electors of the county and without a majority of the voters legally qualified to vote and voting on that question having voted therefor.

Source:

G.L.

§ 447.

G.S.

§ 540.

R.S. 08:

§ 1214.

C.L.

§ 8683.

CSA:

C. 45, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-8.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 733, § 4, effective May 1.

Cross references:

For authority of county to contract debts, see § 6 of art. XI, Colo. Const.

30-11-109. Advertisement for bids on supplies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 103, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1205.

C.L.

§ 8684.

CSA:

C. 45, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-9.

L. 71:

p. 332, § 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2137, § 12, effective June 12.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1010), ch. 17, p. 43, § 1, effective August 7.

30-11-109.5. Purchases of recycled paper and recycled products.

When purchasing any product with public funds, the purchasing agent for the county shall be authorized to purchase products or materials with recycled content that have been source-reduced, that are reusable, or that have been composted, unless one or more of the following conditions exist:

The product is not available within a reasonable period of time;

The product fails to meet applicable purchasing rules, including specifications; or

The product fails to meet federal or state health or safety standards, as set forth in federal or state regulations.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2138, § 13, effective June 12.

Cross references:

For further provisions concerning the purchase of recycled paper and recycled products, see §§ 13-1-133, 24-103-207, and 25-16.5-102.

30-11-110. State suppliers preferred.

It is unlawful for any board of county commissioners of any county to accept any bid or make a purchase of any books, stationery, records, printing, lithographing, or other supplies for any officer of its county, from any person, company, or corporation having its manufactory or principal place of business outside the state of Colorado, when the same can be procured from some person, company, or corporation having its manufactory or principal place of business within this state and at a net cost which shall not exceed the amount for which such books, stationery, records, printing, lithographing, or other supplies can be procured and delivered to them by any person, company, or corporation having its manufactory or principal place of business without the state.

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 103, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1206.

C.L.

§ 8685.

CSA:

C. 45, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-10.

30-11-111. Term of contract. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 104, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 1207.

C.L.

§ 8686.

CSA:

C. 45, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-11.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1010), ch. 17, p. 43, § 2, effective August 7.

30-11-112. Officer cannot contract or purchase. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 104, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 1208.

C.L.

§ 8687.

CSA:

C. 45, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-12.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1010), ch. 17, p. 44, § 3, effective August 7.

30-11-113. Commissioners to furnish blank assessment rolls.

The boards of county commissioners of their respective counties, at the expense of the county, shall furnish annually and in due season, to the assessor of the county, suitable blank assessment rolls, prepared in accordance with the provisions of law; shall also provide suitable books and stationery for the use of each of the county officers of their county, together with appropriate cases and furniture for the safe and convenient keeping of all the books, documents, and papers belonging to each of said officers; and also shall provide official seals for each of said officers when the same are required by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 466.

G.S.

§ 549.

R.S. 08:

§ 1209.

C.L.

§ 8688.

CSA:

C. 45, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-13.

30-11-114. New precincts - change boundaries - reduce number.

The board of county commissioners may set off or organize new precincts, change the boundaries, or reduce the number of those already organized as the public good from time to time requires.

Source:

G.L.

§ 458.

L. 1883:

p. 121, § 1.

G.S.

§ 541.

R.S. 08:

§ 1218.

C.L.

§ 8695.

CSA:

C. 45, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-14.

30-11-115. Board may appropriate for expositions.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state may make such appropriation as it may seem proper for the purpose of enabling such county to secure a proper representation of its interests in exhibits and expositions held in Colorado.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 244, § 2.

G.S.

§ 539.

R.S. 08:

§ 1211.

C.L.

§ 8689.

CSA:

C. 45, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-15.

30-11-116. Appropriations for advertising or marketing.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties within the state of Colorado are authorized to appropriate money from the county general fund for the purpose of advertising or marketing the county.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 320, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1212.

C.L.

§ 8690.

CSA:

C. 45, § 37.

L. 51:

p. 297, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-16.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 5, § 1, effective July 1.

30-11-117. Commissioners to fill vacancies in county offices.

In case a vacancy occurs in any county office, or in any precinct office in any county in this state, by reason of death, resignation, removal, or otherwise, the board of county commissioners of such county has power to fill such vacancy by appointment, subject to section 9 of article XIV of the state constitution, until an election can be held as provided by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 474.

G.S.

§ 553.

R.S. 08:

§ 1240.

C.L.

§ 8716.

CSA:

C. 45, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-17.

30-11-118. County attorney - county collector.

The board of county commissioners of each county of the state, when the interests of the county require it, may employ an attorney, but the person appointed shall be a member of the bar of the supreme court of this state and at least twenty-five years of age. The board may also, when the business of the county requires it, appoint a county collector, whose duty it is to collect license moneys and other special dues of said county; such collector shall receive such compensation as may be allowed by the board of county commissioners.

Source:

G.L.

§ 565.

G.S.

§ 558.

L. 1887:

p. 243, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 1241.

C.L.

§ 8717.

CSA:

C. 45, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-18.

30-11-119. New bond for officers, when.

When the board of county commissioners of any county in this state deems the bond given by the sheriff or other officer of the county insufficient, or when in its opinion the sureties on said bond are insolvent or permanently removed from the county, or when it for any other reason considers said bond insufficient for the public security, it is lawful for the board to require of said sheriff or other officer a new bond, with such sureties and so conditioned as required by law in the first instance.

Source:

G.L.

§ 566.

G.S.

§ 559.

R.S. 08:

§ 1242.

C.L.

§ 8718.

CSA:

C. 45, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-19.

30-11-120. Failure to file bond - office vacant.

In case any sheriff or other officer refuses or neglects, for a period longer than thirty days after receiving notice, to give a new bond as required, it is lawful for the board of county commissioners to declare the office vacant and appoint some other person to fill the vacancy, who shall hold the office until a successor is elected or appointed.

Source:

G.L.

§ 567.

G.S.

§ 560.

R.S. 08:

§ 1243.

C.L.

§ 8719.

CSA:

C. 45, § 66.

CRS 53:

§ 36-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-20.

30-11-121. General accounting records.

The board of county commissioners is responsible for the maintenance of the general accounting records of the county. It is the duty of the county treasurer, county clerk and recorder, county sheriff, and county assessor to furnish, as directed by the board of county commissioners, copies of any and all accounting, administrative, financial, recorded, or assessment records to a person appointed by the board of county commissioners for the purpose of utilizing computer or other record-keeping facilities. Such person shall serve at the pleasure of the board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 226, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-21.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 992, § 1, effective June 4.

30-11-122. Conservation trust fund authorized.

Each county in this state may create a conservation trust fund as provided in section 29-21-101, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 433, § 3, effective July 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-1-22.

30-11-123. New business facilities - expansion of existing business facilities - incentives - limitations - authority to exceed revenue-raising limitations - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state are dependent upon the attraction of new private enterprise as well as the retention and expansion of existing private enterprise; that incentives are often necessary in order to attract private enterprise; and that providing such incentives stimulates economic development in the state and results in the creation and maintenance of new jobs.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any county may negotiate for an incentive payment or credit with any taxpayer who establishes a business facility, as defined in section 39-30-105.1 (6)(b), in the county. In no instance may any negotiation result in an annual incentive payment or credit that is greater than the amount of the taxes levied by the county upon the taxable personal property located at or within the business facility and used in connection with the operation of the business facility for the current property tax year. The term of any agreement made prior to August 6, 2014, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (1) may not exceed ten years, including the term of any original agreement being renewed. The term of any agreement made on or after August 6, 2014, pursuant to this subsection (1) may not exceed thirty-five years, which does not include the term of any prior agreement.

(1.5) (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a county may negotiate an incentive payment or credit for a taxpayer that has an existing business facility located in the county if, based on verifiable documentation, the county is satisfied that there is a substantial risk that the taxpayer will relocate the facility out of state.

The documentation required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) must include information that the taxpayer could reasonably and efficiently relocate the facility out of state and that at least one other state is being considered for the relocation. In order to be eligible for a payment or credit under this subsection (1.5), a taxpayer must identify the specific reasons why the taxpayer is considering leaving the state.

A county shall not give an annual incentive payment or credit under this subsection (1.5) that is greater than the amount of the taxes levied by the county upon the taxable personal property located at or within the existing business facility and used in connection with the operation of the existing business facility for the current property tax year. The term of an agreement made prior to August 6, 2014, pursuant to this subsection (1.5) shall not exceed ten years, and this limit includes any renewals of the original agreement. The term of an agreement made on or after August 6, 2014, pursuant to this subsection (1.5) shall not exceed thirty-five years, and this limit does not include the term of any prior agreement. A county shall not give an annual incentive payment or credit under this subsection (1.5), unless the board of county commissioners approves the payment or credit at a public hearing.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any county may negotiate for an incentive payment or credit with any taxpayer who expands a facility, as defined in section 39-30-105.1 (6)(e), the expansion of which authorizes a taxpayer to claim a credit described in section 39-30-105.1, and that is located in the county. In no instance may any negotiation result in an annual incentive payment or credit that is greater than the amount of the taxes levied by the county upon the taxable personal property directly attributable to the expansion, located at or within the expanded facility, and used in connection with the operation of the expanded facility for the current property tax year. The term of any agreement made prior to August 6, 2014, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (2) may not exceed ten years, including the term of any original agreement being renewed. The term of any agreement made on or after August 6, 2014, pursuant to this subsection (2) may not exceed thirty-five years, which does not include the term of any prior agreement.

For purposes of this section, "county" means any county or city and county.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 2833, § 3, effective January 1, 1995.)

Any county that negotiates any agreement pursuant to the provisions of this section shall inform any municipality in which a new business facility would be located, or an existing or expanded business facility is located, whichever is applicable, of such negotiations.

Any county may adjust the amount of its tax levy authorized pursuant to the provisions of section 29-1-301, C.R.S., or pursuant to a county home rule charter, whichever is applicable, by an additional amount which does not exceed the total amount of annual incentive payments or credits made by such county in accordance with agreements negotiated pursuant to the provisions of this section or section 39-30-107.5, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1454, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 91:

(1) amended and (6) added, p. 723, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 94:

(1)(b), (2), (4), and (6) amended, p. 2833, § 3, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 1120, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 350, § 4, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, (HB 12-1029), ch. 61, p. 219, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1.5) added and (5) amended, (HB 13-1206), ch. 374, p. 2203, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(b), (1.5)(c), and (2) amended, (SB 14-183), ch. 196, p. 720, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2020:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, (HB 20-1166), ch. 103, p. 394, § 2, effective April 1.

Cross references:

(1) For further provisions concerning the Colorado business incentive fund, see article 46.5 of title 24.

(2) In 2012, subsections (1)(b) and (2) were amended by the "Save Colorado Jobs Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 61, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

30-11-124. Fire planning authority.

The board of county commissioners of each county in the state, subject to the requirements of section 25-7-123, C.R.S., may prepare, adopt, and implement a county fire management plan that details individual county policies on fire management for prescribed burns, fuels management, or natural ignition burns on lands owned by the state or county. Such plans shall be developed in coordination with the county sheriff, the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety, and the appropriate state and local governmental entities. All interested parties shall have the opportunity to comment on the plan prior to its adoption and implementation.

County fire management plans created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall:

Clearly define appropriate responses in order to mitigate immediate threats to public safety; and

Set forth the conditions under which prescribed or natural ignition fires shall be managed.

Any county that adopts and adheres to a county fire management plan shall be accorded liability protection pursuant to article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

Federal government agencies, subject to the provisions of sections 25-7-106 (7) and (8) and 25-7-114.7 (2)(a)(III), C.R.S., and private landowners may enter into memoranda of understanding with the board of county commissioners to include public or private lands that are within the boundaries of the county under the county fire management plan. Counties may purchase an indemnification insurance policy and private landowners who enter into memoranda of understanding with the board shall have the opportunity to opt into such policy.

Nothing in this section shall infringe upon or otherwise affect the ability of agricultural producers to conduct burning on their property.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1304, § 8, effective May 26.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-083), ch. 249, p. 1310, § 15, effective May 23.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 249, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

30-11-125. Licensing program for building contractors - contents of program - requirements - exceptions - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Building contractor" means a building contractor who for compensation directs, supervises, or undertakes any work for which a county building permit is required. A county licensing program established in accordance with the provisions of this section shall exclude from the definition of "building contractor" any person whose sole function in the work for which a county building permit is required is to perform labor under the supervision or direction of a building contractor.

"Building contractor" shall not include an electrician required to be licensed by the state pursuant to article 115 of title 12 or a plumber required to be licensed by the state pursuant to article 155 of title 12.

"County" means any county or city and county in the state.

"Municipality" means any home rule or statutory city or town in the state.

"Person" means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, or other legal entity.

Subject to the requirements of this section, any county that has adopted a building code may establish a licensing program to require a person who engages in the business of being a building contractor within the unincorporated areas of the county to obtain a license from the county prior to engaging in the business. The county may develop the licensing program in accordance with the requirements of this section, and any such program may include one or more of the following:

Procedures that a building contractor would follow in order to obtain or renew a license, including the submission of any documentation or information as may be required by the county;

A requirement that the building contractor achieve a passing grade on a nationally recognized examination promulgated by the international code council that is commonly used and accepted in the industry;

Specification of the duration of the license issued by the county;

Subject to the requirements of subsection (3) of this section, the imposition of a reasonable fee to be charged by the county to a building contractor to cover the costs of any testing required to be performed by the county, the processing of the application, or any other costs incurred by the county in connection with the issuance or renewal of a license; or

Grounds for the revocation or suspension of a license issued by the county, grounds for the revocation or suspension of a building permit issued for a project for which the building contractor is found not to be in compliance with the county's licensing requirements, or grounds for the imposition of any lesser sanction, which shall be based on objective standards and criteria developed from the county building code, and procedures to be followed by the county in carrying out the revocation, suspension, or other sanction based upon such grounds, including a process for appealing any sanction so imposed.

Any county that establishes a licensing program pursuant to this section shall issue a license to a building contractor holding a valid license issued by another county or municipality in the state without requiring the building contractor to take or achieve a passing grade on any examination conducted by the county if the license issued by such other county or municipality required the building contractor to achieve a passing grade on a nationally recognized examination promulgated by the international code council commonly used and accepted in the industry. In the case of a building contractor holding a valid license issued by another county or municipality in the state, the fee charged by a secondary county for issuance or renewal of a license in accordance with the requirements of this section shall be reasonable and limited to costs incurred by the secondary county in processing the application and otherwise administering the issuance or renewal of a license required by this section.

If a building contractor applying for a license complies with the requirements for obtaining a license established by the county, the county shall issue a provisional license to the building contractor no later than seven business days after the building contractor has submitted a complete application. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (5) of this section, any failure on the part of the county to issue a nonprovisional license within forty-five days after submission of a complete application to a building contractor who has otherwise satisfied all other requirements for obtaining a license shall not preclude the building contractor from engaging in the business of being a building contractor and applying for a building permit for unincorporated areas of the county.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, no person shall engage in the business of being a building contractor within the unincorporated areas of any county that has adopted a licensing program created pursuant to this section unless the person holds a valid license issued or recognized by the county in accordance with the requirements of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section:

The provisions of this section shall apply to any licensing program operated or administered by a county that is in existence as of August 3, 2007. Any licensing program operated or administered by a county as of August 3, 2007, that satisfies or is amended to satisfy the requirements of this section is hereby ratified as compliant with the requirements of this section and need not be reestablished by the county.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any individual to hold a license to perform repair or maintenance work on his or her own property, nor shall it prevent a person from employing an individual on either a full-time or a part-time basis to perform repair or maintenance work on his or her own property who is not licensed under the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 392, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2019:

(1)(a)(II) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1718, § 214, effective October 1.

30-11-126. Workforce development - incentives - limitations - authority to exceed revenue-raising limitations - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The health, safety, and welfare of the people of Colorado as well as the economic development and growth of local communities in the state depend on the development of a workforce that meets the needs of employers in the state;

Financial incentives are often necessary to attract resources for workforce development, and such incentives can be particularly effective when offered at the local level; and

Providing such incentives stimulates economic development in the state and results in the creation and maintenance of new jobs.

The general assembly further finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the citizens of the state and the economic development of local governments within the state to create an incentive at the county level for taxpayers to contribute to a program that allows counties to provide financial assistance to county residents to pursue post-secondary education or training.

For purposes of this section, "county" means any county or city and county.

Any county may establish a workforce development program, to be known as "bright future Colorado", to provide financial assistance to county residents who pursue post-secondary education or training from an accredited institution of higher education or certified training program. A county workforce development program may include, but need not be limited to, county residents who are high school graduates, county residents who have successfully completed a high school equivalency examination, as defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5), C.R.S., or county residents who are veterans. Any county that establishes a workforce development program may also establish a workforce development fund to accept contributions for the purpose of the program.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a county that has established a workforce development program may offer an incentive, in the form of a county property tax credit or rebate, to a residential or commercial property owner in the county who contributes to a county workforce development fund.

A county shall not make any appropriation in furtherance of a workforce development program or give any credit or rebate pursuant to this section unless the board of county commissioners approves the total program amount annually at a public budget hearing.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-082), ch. 11, p. 25, § 1, effective August 5.

30-11-127. Pioneer trail - designation - signs.

The board of county commissioners may designate, by resolution, any public roads in the county as a section of a pioneer trail. A pioneer trail consists of public roads that follow as closely as possible the original trails or routes of travel of national historic significance. To make such designation, the board must identify all of the roads that make up the pioneer trail. The board shall not designate a pioneer trail across public lands on a road administered by the federal government unless the road is designated as open to travel by the appropriate federal land management agency. Except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the designation of the pioneer trail is effective upon the date of the resolution.

If a county designates any portion of a state highway as a pioneer trail, the designation is not effective unless the general assembly, acting by joint resolution, also designates the portion of the state highway as part of the pioneer trail.

If any of the designated roads are part of the state highway system, the board of county commissioners shall send a copy of the resolution to the department of transportation. If any of the designated roads are on public lands administered by the federal government, the board shall send a copy of the resolution to the appropriate federal land management agency.

A county may post, or allow to be posted, identifying and informative signs related to the pioneer trail along county roads.

The authority to designate a pioneer trail is intended to highlight Colorado's cultural and historical heritage and to promote historical tourism and education. Nothing in this section affects existing rights-of-way or ownership of public roads.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1106), ch. 107, p. 308, § 1, effective August 10.

30-11-128. Mobile home parks - definition.

The board of county commissioners of each county has the power to adopt, administer, and enforce ordinances and resolutions to provide for the safe and equitable operation of mobile home parks throughout the unincorporated areas of the county. These ordinances and resolutions may be enacted within the scope of the "Mobile Home Park Act", part 2 of article 12 of title 38, and further as the board deems necessary to protect home owners' equity in the safe use and enjoyment of the mobile homes and mobile home lots, including but not limited to the imposition of penalties or adoption of a local registration system.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an ordinance or resolution enacted by a county's board of county commissioners is only enforceable within the unincorporated area of the county.

One or more contiguous counties and any municipality or town within each county may enter into intergovernmental agreements to extend the applicability of any ordinance or resolution adopted under this section to and throughout any participating county, municipality, or town.

For purposes of this section, "home owner", "landlord", "mobile home", "mobile home lot", and "mobile home park" have the same meaning as they are defined in section 38-12-201.5.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1309), ch. 281, p. 2627, § 3, effective May 23.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1309, see section 1 of chapter 281, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

30-11-129. Third-party food delivery service fee restrictions - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Declared public health disaster emergency" means the declared public health disaster emergency to address the COVID-19 pandemic of 2020, as declared by the governor by executive order.

"Retail food establishment" means a retail food establishment, as defined in section 25-4-1602 (14), that pays an annual license fee as required by section 25-4-1607 (1)(a), (1.5)(a)(I), or (1.5)(b)(I). "Retail food establishment" does not include grocery stores or convenience stores.

"Third-party food delivery service" means any person, company, website, mobile application, or other internet service that offers or arranges for the sale and the same-day delivery or same-day pickup of prepared food or beverages from a retail food establishment.

During a declared public health disaster emergency, the board of county commissioners of each county may adopt, administer, and enforce ordinances and resolutions, applying to the county's unincorporated area only, that:

Limit the amount of the fee that a third-party food delivery service may charge to a retail food establishment, excluding fees related to credit card processing, within the county where indoor dining is prohibited and until indoor dining is again permitted in the county at a capacity of at least fifty percent or below at the discretion of the county;

Restrict the ability of a third-party food delivery service to reduce the compensation rate paid to a delivery service driver or withhold gratuities or tips to a retail food establishment, its staff, or any delivery service driver to offset revenue reductions resulting from any ordinance or resolution enacted pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section;

Require a third-party food delivery service to disclose to a consumer using the third-party food delivery service to make a purchase from a retail food establishment any commission, fee, or other monetary payment charged by the third-party food delivery service to the retail food establishment for a purchase from the retail food establishment; and

Restrict a third-party food delivery service's ability to perform a service for a retail food establishment without the retail food establishment's consent.

A board of county commissioners that adopts an ordinance or resolution pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is immune from liability for all claims for injury resulting from any economic damage that a party may incur due to the ordinance or resolution except to the extent that the ordinance or resolution is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to constitute a taking of private property in violation of the United States or state constitution.

Source:

L. 2020, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, (HB 20B-1005), ch. 4, p. 27, § 2, effective December 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20B-1005, see section 1 of chapter 4, Session Laws of Colorado 2020, First Extraordinary Session.